Utah statutes.
17-25a-4.   Rates recoverable -- Exception.
(1)  The rates recoverable through court action for service of process by a
constable are governed by Section 17-22-2.5, 17-25-3, or 17-25-5 when
applicable.
(2)  Constable fees that exceed the amounts in Section 17-22-2.5 are
recoverable in court:
(a)  by the constable only if he has received prior approval for the increased
fee from the party requesting the service; and
(b)  by a prevailing party as a cost of the action only if the court finds the
service and increased fee are justifiable.
